Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 3. Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District.

§ 51-13-101.
Legislative determination and declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that the waterways and surface waters of the state are among its basic resources, that the overflow and surface waters of the state have not heretofore been conserved to realize their full beneficial use, that the utilization, development, conservation, and regulation of such waters are necessary to insure an adequate flood control program, sanitary water supply at all times, to promote the balanced economic development of the state, and to aid in conservation and development of state forests, irrigation of lands needing irrigation, navigation, and pollution abatement. It is further determined and declared that the preservation, conservation, storage, and regulation of the waters of the Tombigbee River, its tributaries, and its overflow waters for domestic, municipal, commercial, industrial, agricultural, and manufacturing purposes, for recreational uses, flood control, timber development, irrigation, navigation, and pollution abatement are, as a matter of public policy, for the general welfare of the entire people of the state.

The creation of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District is determined to be necessary and essential to the accomplishment of the aforesaid purposes, and this article operates on a subject in which the state at large is interested. All the terms and provisions of this article are to be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes herein set forth, this being a remedial law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-131; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 1; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 32, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Dec. 12, 1962).

§ 51-13-103.
General authority to organize.

The Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District may hereafter be organized in this state under the provisions of this article, in the manner hereinafter provided for. This water management district shall be an agency of the state and a body politic and corporate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-132; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 2; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 32, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Dec. 12, 1962).

§ 51-13-105.
Board of directors.

All powers of the district shall be exercised by a board of directors, to be composed of the following:

Each member of the Tombigbee Valley Authority as created by virtue of Sections 51-13-1 through 51-13-9, whose county becomes a part of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District shall be a member of the Board of Directors of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District, and each state-at-large member of the Tombigbee Valley Authority shall become a member of the Board of Directors of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District when one or more entire counties become members of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District. Such directors shall serve on this board during their term of office on the Tombigbee Valley Authority. In addition, the board of supervisors of each county within the Tombigbee River Basin which elects to become a member of the district shall appoint one (1) board member to serve for a term of four (4) years or until his successor is named. The Governor shall appoint one (1) member from each county added to the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District which county is not now a member of the Tombigbee Valley Authority, and such member shall serve for a four-year term or until his successor is appointed.

The Department of Environmental Quality, the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Forestry Commission, and the State Board of Health of the State of Mississippi shall each appoint one (1) director from that department to serve on the board of directors of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District, to serve at the pleasure of the entity appointing him but not to exceed four-year terms.

Each director shall take and subscribe to the general oath of office required by Section 268 of the Constitution of the State of Mississippi before a chancery clerk that he will faithfully discharge the duties of the office, which oath shall be filed with the said clerk and by him preserved.

Each director shall receive compensation at a per diem rate as provided in Section 25-3-69 for each day or fraction thereof spent in actual discharge of his official duties and shall be reimbursed for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of his official duties in accordance with the requirements of Section 25-3-41.

The board of directors shall annually elect from its number a president and a vice-president of the district and such other officers as in the judgment of the board are necessary. The president shall be the chief executive officer of the district and the presiding officer of the board, and shall have the same right to vote as any other director. The vice-president shall perform all duties and exercise all powers conferred by this article upon the president when the president is absent or fails or declines to act, except the president’s right to vote. The board shall also appoint a secretary and a treasurer who may or may not be members of the board, and it may combine those offices. The treasurer shall give bond in the sum of not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) as set by the board of directors, and each director shall give bond in the sum of not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) with sureties qualified to do business in this state, and the premiums on said bonds shall be an expense of the district. The condition of each such bond shall be that the treasurer or director will faithfully perform all duties of his office and account for all money or other assets which shall come into his custody as treasurer or director of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-133; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 3; Laws, 1964, ch. 251, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964); Laws, 1994, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 51-13-107.
Creation of district.

Within twenty (20) days after the passage of this article, the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality, State Board of Health, Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, and the Forestry Commission of the State of Mississippi shall appoint their respective members to the proposed district board of directors as provided in Section 51-13-105. The four (4) appointive members, upon taking the oath as provided, shall meet in the Office of the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality in Jackson, Mississippi, within ten (10) days and adopt by a majority vote a resolution setting forth their intentions of creating the district and shall forthwith send a certified copy of said resolution to: (1) each member of the Tombigbee Valley Authority as now constituted, (2) the Governor, (3) executive officers of the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality, Board of Health, Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, and Forestry Commission, and (4) the president of the board of supervisors and chancery clerk of each county through which any part of the Tombigbee River or any of its tributaries lie. The four (4) state agencies herein named and the Tombigbee Valley Authority may, within ten (10) days from receipt of said resolution, adopt its own resolution favorable or unfavorable to the creation of said district; and the respective boards of supervisors may at their next regular meeting likewise adopt a resolution favorable or unfavorable to creating said district. All of said resolutions adopted shall be certified by its secretary, clerk, or executive officer and shall be filed with each state agency, political subdivision, or other agency named in Section 55-13-105.

Every board of supervisors of those counties desiring to become members of the district, through which the Tombigbee River or any of its tributaries lie, shall, upon receipt of the certified resolutions mentioned in this section, declare said board’s intentions by adopting a resolution expressing its desire to have said district created and to levy an ad valorem tax not to exceed one-half (1/2) mill on all the taxable property within the Tombigbee Watershed area of said county for the use and benefit of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District. The said resolution shall be published once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in the county and having a general circulation therein, and if no petition signed by twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the county is filed with the board requesting the calling of an election on the question of the county’s participation in the district and the levying of the one-half (1/2) mill tax levy aforesaid, the board may proceed to have the county become a member of said district and to levy the one-half (1/2) mill tax levy but if, within twenty-one (21) days after the date of the first publication of said resolution, a petition signed by at least twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of said county, requesting an election on the proposition of said county becoming a member of the proposed district and the levying of the one-half (1/2) mill tax as herein provided, is filed, said election shall be held and conducted as now provided by law for such elections. If such an election is held and a majority of those voting therein vote for the proposition, the board shall, by appropriate resolution, bring the county into the district and levy the one-half (1/2) mill tax as otherwise provided by law. If the majority of those voting in such election shall vote against the proposition, then the county shall not become a member of the district nor levy the one-half (1/2) mill tax; and no further election shall be so conducted until the lapse of two (2) years after the last election.

Whenever an aggregate of six (6) counties have become members of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District in the manner provided in this section, the said district shall be created as an agency of the state and a body politic and corporate with all of the powers granted it by statute.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-134; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 225, § 1; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 32, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 95, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 51-13-109.
Subsequent members.

Any eligible county may become a member of the district, subsequent to its creation, in the manner as the original counties became members and new counties shall have the same power and authority and be entitled to equal consideration of the district’s board of directors, not inconsistent with the purposes of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-134; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 4; Laws, 1962, ch. 225, § 1; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 32, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Dec. 12, 1962).

§ 51-13-111.
Powers of district.

The Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District through its board of directors is hereby empowered:

To develop, in conjunction with the United States Army Corps of Engineers, United States Secretary of Agriculture, or with the head of any other federal or state agency as may be involved, plans for public works of improvement for the prevention of floodwater damage, or the conservation, development, navigation, utilization and disposal of water, including the impoundment, diversion, flowage and distribution of waters for beneficial use as defined in Chapter 3 of this title.

To enter into agreements with the United States of America, as represented by the United States Army Corps of Engineers, to meet the requirements of local cooperation for flood control and navigation projects as set out in House Document No. 167, 84th Congress, First Session, as authorized by Public Law 85-500, 85th Congress, dated July 3, 1958, as amended, and House Document No. 486, 79th Congress, Second Session, as approved by Public Law 525, 79th Congress, as amended.

To impound overflow water and the surface water of the Tombigbee River or its tributaries within the project area, within or without the district, at the place or places and in the amount as may be approved by the Office of Land and Water Resources of the State of Mississippi, by the construction of a dam or dams, reservoir or reservoirs, work or works, plants and any other necessary or useful related facilities contemplated and described as a part of the project, within or without the district, to control, store and preserve these waters, and to use, distribute, and sell them, to construct or otherwise acquire within the project area all works, plants, or other facilities necessary or useful to the project for processing the water and transporting it to cities and other facilities for domestic, municipal, commercial, industrial, agricultural and manufacturing purposes, and is hereby given the power to control open channels for water delivery purposes and water transportation.

To acquire and develop any other available water necessary or useful to the project and to construct, acquire and develop all facilities within the project area deemed necessary or useful with respect thereto, including terminals.

To forest and reforest, and to aid in the foresting and reforesting of the project area, and to prevent and to aid in the prevention of soil erosion and flood within the area; to control, store, and preserve within the boundaries of the project area the waters of the Tombigbee River or any of its tributaries for irrigation of lands and for prevention of water pollution.

To acquire by condemnation all property of any kind, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest therein, within or without the boundaries of the district, necessary for the projects and the exercise of the powers, rights, privileges and functions conferred upon the district by this article, according to the procedure provided by law for the condemnation of lands or other property taken for rights-of-way or other purposes by railroads, telephone, or telegraph companies, and according to the provisions of Section 29-1-1. For the purposes of this article the right of eminent domain of the district shall be superior and dominant to the right of eminent domain of railroad, telegraph, telephone, gas, power and other companies or corporations and shall be sufficient to enable the acquisition of county roads, state highways, or other public property in the project area, and the acquisition or relocation of this property in the project area. The cost of right-of-way purchases, rerouting and elevating all other county-maintained roads affected by construction shall be borne by the water management district, and new construction shall be of equal quality as in roads existing as of May 1, 1962. The county in which the work is done may assist in these costs if the board of supervisors desires.

The amount and character of interest in land, other property, and easements to be acquired shall be determined by the board of directors, and their determination shall be conclusive and shall not be subject to attack in the absence of manifold abuse of discretion or fraud on the part of such board in making such determination. However,

In acquiring lands, either by negotiation or condemnation, the district shall not acquire minerals or royalties within the project area; sand and gravel shall not be considered as minerals within the meaning of this section; and

No person or persons owning the drilling rights or the right to share in production shall be prevented from exploring, developing, or producing oil or gas with necessary rights-of-way for ingress and egress, pipelines, and other means of transporting these products by reason of the inclusion of the lands or mineral interests within the project area, whether below or above the waterline, but any activities shall be under reasonable regulations by the board of directors that will adequately protect the project; and

In drilling and developing, these persons are hereby vested with a special right to have mineral interests integrated and their lands developed in the drilling unit or units that the State Oil and Gas Board shall establish after due consideration of the rights of all owners to be included in the drilling unit.

Moreover, when any site or plot of land is to be sold to any person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of operating recreational facilities thereon for profit, the board shall, by resolution, specify the terms and conditions of the sale and shall advertise for public bids thereon. When these bids are received, they shall be publicly opened by the board, and the board shall thereupon determine the highest and best bid submitted and shall immediately notify the former owner of the site or plot of the amount, terms, and conditions of the highest and best bid. The former owner of the site or plot shall have the exclusive right at his option, for a period of thirty (30) days after written notice is received by the landowner of the determination of the highest and best bid by the board, to purchase the site or plot of land by meeting the highest and best bid and by complying with all terms and conditions of the sale as specified by the board. However, the board shall not sell to any former owner more land than was taken from the former owner for the construction of the project, or one-quarter (1/4) mile of shoreline, whichever shall be the lesser. If this option is not exercised by the former owner within a period of thirty (30) days, the board shall accept the highest and best bid submitted.

Any bona fide resident householder actually living or maintaining a residence on land taken by the district by condemnation shall have the right to repurchase his former land from the board of directors for a price not exceeding the price paid for condemning his land, plus any permanent improvements.

In addition and notwithstanding any other provision in this section to the contrary, the board may lease or rent all or any portion of any property that it owns to any person, firm, or corporation for the purpose of operating recreational facilities for profit or not for profit or for any other public purpose provided the land is open for the use of the general public or is otherwise used for the public benefit and upon any other terms and conditions as the board may determine. The leasing or renting of all or any portion of any such land upon said conditions shall require a resolution duly adopted by the board and shall be exempt from any bid requirements in this section.

To require the necessary relocation of roads and highways, railroad, telephone, and telegraph lines and properties, electric power lines, gas pipelines and mains and facilities in the project area, or to require the anchoring or other protection of any of these, provided due compensation is first paid the owners thereof or agreement is had with the owners regarding the payment of the cost of relocation. Further, the district is hereby authorized to acquire easements or rights-of-way in or outside of the project area for the relocation of roads, highways, railroad, telephone, and telegraph lines and properties, electric power lines, gas pipelines and mains and facilities, and to convey them to the owners thereof in connection with the relocation as a part of the construction of the project. However, the directors of the district shall not close any public access road to the project existing prior to the construction of the reservoir unless the board of supervisors of the county in which the road is located agrees thereto.

To overflow and inundate any public lands and public property, including sixteenth section lands and in lieu lands, within the project area.

To construct, extend, improve, maintain and reconstruct, to cause to be constructed, extended, improved, maintained and reconstructed, and to use and operate all facilities of any kind within the project area necessary or convenient to the project and to the exercise of powers, rights, privileges and functions.

To sue and be sued in its corporate name.

To adopt, use, and alter a corporate seal.

To make bylaws for the management and regulation of its affairs.

To employ engineers, attorneys, and all necessary agents and employees to properly finance, construct, operate, and maintain the project and the plants and to pay reasonable compensation for these services; for all services in connection with the issuance of bonds as provided in this article, the attorney’s fee shall not exceed one-quarter of one percent (1/4 of 1%) of the principal amount of these bonds. For any other services, only reasonable compensation shall be paid for these services. The board shall have the right to employ a general manager, who shall, at the discretion of the board, have the power to employ and discharge employees. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, it may employ fiscal agents or advisors in connection with its financing program and in connection with the issuance of its bonds.

To make contracts and to execute instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers, rights, privileges, and functions conferred upon it by this article.

To make or cause to be made surveys and engineering investigations relating to the project, or related projects, for the information of the district to facilitate the accomplishment of the purposes for which it is created.

To apply for and accept grants from the United States of America, or from any corporation or agency created or designated by the United States of America, and to ratify and accept applications heretofore or hereafter made by voluntary associations to these agencies for grants to construct, maintain or operate any project or projects which hereafter may be undertaken or contemplated by the district.

To do any other acts or things necessary, requisite, or convenient to the exercising of the powers, rights, privileges or functions conferred upon it by this article or any other law.

To make contracts in the issuance of bonds that may be necessary to insure the marketability thereof.

To enter into contracts with municipalities, corporations, districts, public agencies, political subdivisions of any kind, and others for any services, facilities or commodities that the project may provide. The district is also authorized to contract with any municipality, corporation, or public agency for the rental, leasing, purchase, or operation of the water production, water filtration or purification, water supply and distributing facilities of the municipality, corporation, or public agency upon consideration as the district and entity may agree. Any contract may be upon any terms and for any time as the parties may agree, and it may provide that it shall continue in effect until bonds specified therein, refunding bonds issued in lieu of these bonds, and all obligations are paid. Any contract with any political subdivision shall be binding upon these political subdivisions according to its terms, and the municipalities or other political subdivisions shall have the power to enter into these contracts as in the discretion of the governing authorities thereof would be to the best interest of the people of the municipality or other political subdivision. These contracts may include, within the discretion of the governing authorities, a pledge of the full faith and credit of the political subdivisions for the performance thereof.

To fix and collect charges and rates for any services, facilities or commodities furnished by it in connection with the project, and to impose penalties for failure to pay these charges and rates when due.

To operate and maintain within the project area, with the consent of the governing body of any city or town located within the district, any works, plants or facilities of any city deemed necessary or convenient to the accomplishment of the purposes for which the district is created.

Subject to the provisions of this article, from time to time to lease, sell, or otherwise lawfully dispose of any property of any kind, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest therein within the project area or acquired outside the project area as authorized in this article, for the purpose of furthering the business of the district.

When, in the opinion of the board of directors as shown by resolution duly passed, it shall not be necessary to the carrying on of the business of the district that the district own any lands acquired, the board shall advertise these lands for sale to the highest and best bidder for cash and shall receive and publicly open the bids thereon. The board shall, by resolution, determine the highest and best bid submitted for the land and shall thereupon notify the former owner, his/her heirs or devisees, by registered mail of the land to be sold and the highest and best bid received therefor, and the former owner, or his/her heirs or devisees, shall have the exclusive right at his/her or their option for a period of thirty (30) days in which to meet such highest and best bid and to purchase the property. Provided further, that the board may transfer title to that certain property known as the Trace State Park in Pontotoc County to the Department of Environmental Quality; provided, however, that any of the property that is under current lease shall not be included in the transfer. Such transfer of title shall require a resolution duly adopted by the board and by the Commission on Environmental Quality and shall be exempt from any bid requirements herein. In addition, the board may transfer title to that certain property known as the Elvis Presley Park in Lee County to Lee County, Mississippi, upon the terms and conditions as it may determine. The transfer of title shall require a resolution duly adopted by the board and shall be exempt from any bid requirement in this section. In addition, the board may transfer title to all or any portion of that certain property known as the Elvis Presley Park in Lee County to the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks upon the terms and conditions as it may determine, including, but not limited to, authorizing the board to pay the sum of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) to the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks at the time of the transfer with such funds to be used by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks for the construction of an office building on the Elvis Presley Park for use by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks. Such transfer of title and the payment of such sum of money shall require a resolution duly adopted by the board and by the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and shall be exempt from any bid requirement in this section.

To prevent or aid in the prevention of damages to persons or property from the waters of the Tombigbee River or any of its tributaries.

To acquire by purchase, lease, gift or in any other manner (otherwise than by condemnation) and to maintain, use, and operate all property of any kind, real, personal, or mixed, or any interest therein within the project area, within or without the boundaries of the district, necessary for the project and convenient to the exercise of the powers, rights, privileges and functions conferred upon the district by this article.

In the purchase of or in the entering into of all lease-purchase agreements for supplies, equipment, heavy equipment, and the like, the directors shall in all instances comply with the provisions of law pertaining to public purchases by public bids on these supplies and equipment.

In addition to, or in conjunction with, any other powers and duties of the district arising under this chapter, to exercise those powers, duties and functions of a joint water management district set forth in Sections 51-8-27 through 51-8-55, except the power of eminent domain under Section 51-8-33. Before exercising those powers and duties, the district must comply with the provisions of Sections 51-8-63 and 51-8-65. In exercising the functions of a joint water management district, the district may apply to the Environmental Quality Permit Board for delegation of those powers and duties as provided by Section 51-3-15, and to apply to the Mississippi Commission on Environmental Quality for delegation of those powers and duties provided by Section 51-3-21.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-135, Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 5; Laws, 1962 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 32, § 4; Laws, 1986, ch. 406; Laws, 1993, ch. 615, § 9; Laws, 1995, ch. 616, § 6; Laws, 1998, ch. 554, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 625, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 25, 2002.).

§ 51-13-113.
Construction contracts.

All construction contracts by the district, where the amount of the contract shall exceed two thousand, five hundred dollars ($2,500.00), shall be made upon at least three weeks’ public notice by advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, which notice shall state the thing to be done and invite sealed proposals, to be filed with the secretary of the district, to do the work; and in all such cases, before the notice shall be published, the plans and specifications for the work shall be filed with the secretary of the district and there remain. The board of directors of the district shall award the contract to the lowest and best bidder, who will comply with the terms imposed by such board and enter into bond with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board, in such penalty as shall be fixed by such board but in no case to be less than the contract price, conditioned for the prompt, proper, and efficient performance of the contract.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-136; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-115.
Park and recreation facilities.

The Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District is authorized to establish or otherwise provide for public parks and recreation facilities and for the preservation of fish and wildlife, and to acquire land otherwise than by condemnation except as provided in subsection (e) of Section 51-13-111 for such purposes, within the project area.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-137; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-117.
Rules and regulations.

The board of directors of the district shall have the power to adopt and promulgate all reasonable regulations to secure, maintain, and preserve the sanitary condition of all water in and to flow into any reservoir owned by the district, to prevent waste of water or the unauthorized use thereof, and to regulate residence, hunting, fishing, boating, camping, and all recreational and business privileges along or around any such reservoir, any body of land, or any easement owned by the district.

Such district may prescribe reasonable penalties for the breach of any regulation of the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-138; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-119.
Appropriation permit.

The district is empowered to obtain through appropriate hearings an appropriation permit or permits from the board of water commissioners of the State of Mississippi as provided for in Sections 51-3-1 through 51-3-53.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-139; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-121.
State tax used for water supply district fund.

In each county of the State of Mississippi which is part of the Tombigbee River Valley Water Management District, beginning with the ad valorem tax assessment for the calendar year 1964, payable on or before February 1, 1965, and so long as any bonds issued hereunder and other obligations are outstanding, the tax collector of said county shall pay into the depository selected by said water district for said purpose the amount of two mills of all ad valorem taxes due by said county to the State of Mississippi which is collected by the tax collector of said county, which may be collected by any lawful taxing agency of said county and state and for said county and the State of Mississippi shall continue to levy not less than two mills ad valorem taxes on each county in the district so long as any obligations or bonds issued pursuant to this article remain outstanding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-140; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).

§ 51-13-123.
Board of directors to issue bonds.

The board of directors of the district is hereby authorized and empowered to borrow money or issue bonds of the district for the purpose of paying the costs of acquiring, owning, constructing, operating, repairing, and maintaining the projects and works specified herein, including related facilities and including all financing and financial advisory charges, interest during construction, engineering, architectural, legal, and other expenses incidental to and necessary for the foregoing, or for the carrying out of any power conferred by this article. Said board of directors is authorized and empowered to borrow money and issue bonds at such times and in such amounts as shall be provided for by resolution of the said board of directors, not to exceed the limitation prescribed in Section 51-13-127. All such bonds so issued by said district shall be secured solely by a pledge of the avails of the two mills ad valorem tax levy provided for in Section 51-13-121 or so much thereof as may be necessary therefor, and of the net revenues as hereinafter defined or so much thereof as may be necessary therefor. Such bonds shall not constitute general obligations of the State of Mississippi or of the counties comprising said district, and such bonds shall not be secured by a pledge of the full faith, credit, and resources of said state or of said counties. Bonds of the district shall not be included in computing any present or future debt limit of any county in such district under any present or future law. “Revenues” as used in this article shall mean all charges, rentals, tolls, rates, gifts, grants, tax proceeds, moneys, and all other funds coming into the possession of the district by virtue of the provisions of this article, except the proceeds from the sale of bonds issued hereunder, and except the avails of the two mill ad valorem tax levy provided for in Section 51-13-121. “Net revenues” as used in this article shall mean the revenues after payment of costs and expenses of operation and maintenance of the project and related facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-141; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 11; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 32, § 5; Laws, 1964, ch. 251, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 51-13-125.
Details of bonds; supplemental powers conferred in issuance of bonds.

All such bonds provided for by Section 51-13-123 shall be negotiable instruments within the meaning of the Uniform Commercial Code of this state, shall be lithographed or engraved and printed in two (2) or more colors to prevent counterfeiting, shall be in denominations of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), shall be registered as issued, and shall be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward. Each such bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued and the total amount authorized to be issued, it shall be payable to bearer, and the interest to accrue thereon shall be evidenced by proper coupons to be attached thereto. Such bonds shall bear interest at such rate or rates, not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum, as may be determined by the sale of such bonds. They shall mature annually in such amounts and at such times as shall be provided by the resolution of the board of directors. However, no bond shall have a longer maturity than forty (40) years from January 1, 1965, and the first maturity date thereof shall be not more than five (5) years from the date of such bonds. The denomination, form and place or places of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution of the board of directors of the district. Such bonds shall be signed by the president and secretary of such board with the seal of the district affixed thereto, but the coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such president and secretary. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for a period not exceeding one (1) year.

Such bonds may be called in, paid and redeemed in inverse numerical order on any interest date prior to maturity, upon not less than thirty (30) days’ notice to the paying agent or agents designated in such bonds, and at such premium as may be designated in such bonds. In no case shall any premiums exceed six percent (6%) of the face value of such bonds.

All such bonds shall contain in substance a statement to the effect that they are secured solely by a pledge of the avails of the two (2) mills ad valorem tax levy provided for in Section 51-13-121, or so much thereof as may be necessary therefor, and of the net revenues as hereinabove defined or so much thereof as may be necessary therefor, and that they do not constitute general obligations of the state of Mississippi or of the counties comprising said district, and are not secured by a pledge of the full faith, credit and resources of said state or of such counties.

All such bonds as provided for herein shall be sold at public sale as now provided by law. No such sale shall be at a price so low as to require the payment of interest on the money received therefor at more than six percent (6%) per annum computed with relation to the absolute maturity of the bonds, in accordance with standard tables of bond values, excluding from such computation the amount of any premium to be paid on redemption of any bonds prior to maturity.

This article shall be full and complete authority for the issuance of the bonds provided for herein, and no restriction or limitation otherwise prescribed by law shall apply herein.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-142; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 12; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex. Sess., ch. 32, § 6; Laws, 1964, ch. 251, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1983).

§ 51-13-127.
Limitation on amount of bonds.

Bonds issued pursuant to this article shall not exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000.00) in principal amount.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-143; Laws, 1962, ch. 224, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 1, 1962).